Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 14
INDEPENDENT RESTORATION AND
PRESERVATION COMMISSION

44-30-1401. Definitions.

As used in this part 14, unless the context otherwise requires:

"City" means a city that is not a certified local government as defined in section 44-30-103 (7) and that receives money from the state historical fund for historic preservation purposes.

"Commission" means an independent restoration and preservation commission created pursuant to section 44-30-1202 (5).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 234, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1701 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1402. Independent restoration and preservation commission - appointments - qualifications - new appointments - appointments without nominations.

Pursuant to section 44-30-1202 (5), the governing body of a city shall create an independent restoration and preservation commission. The governing body shall appoint seven members to the commission as follows:

Two persons who are architects shall be appointed from nominees submitted by the Colorado chapter of the American institute of architects or any successor organization.

Two persons who are experts in historic preservation shall be appointed from nominees submitted by the Colorado historical society.

Two persons who shall each have a degree in either urban planning or landscape architecture shall be appointed from nominees submitted by the Colorado chapter of the American planning association or any successor organization.

One person who is a member of the community shall be appointed directly by the governing body of the city.

In making appointments to the commission, the governing body of the city shall give due consideration to maintaining a balance of interests and skills in the composition of the commission and to the individual qualifications of the candidates, including their training, experience, and knowledge in the areas of architecture, landscape architecture, the history of the community, real estate, law, and urban planning.

At any time that the term of office of a member of the commission is due to expire or when a member resigns, the governing body of the city shall request at least two nominees for each opening from the appropriate entity listed in subsection (1) of this section; except that this requirement shall not apply to the member of the community appointed directly by the governing body. The governing body shall make the appointments from the appropriate list of nominations.

If the nominations required to make appointments or to fill vacancies have not been received by the governing body of the city within forty-five days after a written request for the required list has been sent to the nominating entity, the governing body may appoint members of the commission without nominations. However, the governing body shall give consideration to the qualifications of the appointee as if the appointee were nominated by the designated nominating entity.

Members of the commission shall be appointed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the governing body of the city. Each member shall continue to serve until the member's successor has been duly appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and is acting, but the period shall not extend more than ninety days past the expiration of the first member's term. The governing body shall determine the length of terms and whether the terms are staggered.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 234, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1702 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1403. Funding - compensation.

Costs associated with the operation of the commission shall be paid from the city's share of preservation and restoration money from the state historical fund.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. To the extent authorized by the governing body of the city, members of the commission may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties, including an allowance for mileage.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 235, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1703 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1404. Officers - bylaws - rules.

The commission shall elect a chairperson and any officers that it may require.

The commission shall make and adopt bylaws governing its work.

The commission may adopt rules for the administration and enforcement of part 12 of this article 30 and this part 14.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 235, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1704 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1405. Meetings.

The commission shall act only at regularly scheduled semi-monthly meetings, that shall be held at a time determined by the governing body of the city, or at meetings of which not less than five days' notice has been given. Absent the objection of any member, the chairperson may cancel or postpone a regularly scheduled meeting of the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 235, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1705 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1406. Quorum - action.

No official business of the commission shall be conducted unless a quorum of not less than four members is present. The concurring vote of at least four members of the commission is necessary to constitute an official act of the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 235, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1706 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1407. Final agency action - judicial review.

Any official decision of the commission shall be considered final agency action and subject to judicial review in a court of competent jurisdiction. No official decision of the commission shall be appealable to or reviewable by the governing body of the city.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 236, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1707 as it existed prior to 2018.